Utah statutes.
20A-3-202.5.   Challenges to a voter's eligibility at time of voting -- Procedure.

(1) (a)  A poll worker or a person who lives in the voting precinct may challenge a voter's right to vote in that voting precinct or in that election if:

(i)  the person making the challenge and the challenged voter are both present at the polling place at the time the challenge is made; and

(ii)  the challenge is made when the challenged voter applies for a ballot.

(b)  A person may make a challenge by orally stating the challenged voter's name and the basis for the challenge, as provided under Section 20A-3-202.

(2)  The poll worker shall record a challenge in the official register and on the challenge sheets in the pollbook, including:

(a)  the name of the challenged voter;

(b)  the name of the person making the challenge; and

(c)  the basis asserted for the challenge.

(3)  If a voter's right to vote is challenged under this section, the poll worker shall follow the procedures and requirements of Section 20A-3-105.5.



Enacted by Chapter 83, 2010 General Session

